Alaska, session 34, HB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 04.21.065(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) A holder of one of the following types of licenses or permits shall post on 05 the licensed or designated premises two [THREE] separate warning signs as described 06 in (b) of this section: 07 (1) brewery manufacturer license under AS 04.09.020 with a 08 manufacturer sampling endorsement under AS 04.09.410; 09 (2) winery manufacturer license under AS 04.09.030 with a 10 manufacturer sampling endorsement under AS 04.09.410; 11 (3) distillery manufacturer license under AS 04.09.040 with a 12 manufacturer sampling endorsement under AS 04.09.410; 13 (4) beverage dispensary license under AS 04.09.200; 14 (5) restaurant or eating place license under AS 04.09.210; 15 (6) club license under AS 04.09.220; 01 (7) package store license under AS 04.09.230; 02 (8) pub license under AS 04.09.240; 03 (9) theater license under AS 04.09.250; 04 (10) common carrier dispensary license under AS 04.09.260; 05 (11) sporting activity or event license under AS 04.09.270; 06 (12) outdoor recreation lodge license under AS 04.09.280; 07 (13) fair license under AS 04.09.290; 08 (14) golf course license under AS 04.09.300; 09 (15) destination resort license under AS 04.09.310; 10 (16) brewery retail license under AS 04.09.320; 11 (17) winery retail license under AS 04.09.330; 12 (18) distillery retail license under AS 04.09.340; 13 (19) beverage dispensary tourism license under AS 04.09.350; 14 (20) seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under 15 AS 04.09.360; 16 (21) beverage dispensary caterer's permit under AS 04.09.610; 17 (22) restaurant caterer's dining permit under AS 04.09.620; 18 (23) club caterer's permit under AS 04.09.630; 19 (24) art exhibit event permit under AS 04.09.640; 20 (25) music festival permit under AS 04.09.650; 21 (26) nonprofit organization event permit under AS 04.09.660; 22 (27) package store tasting event permit under AS 04.09.680; 23 (28) conditional contractor's permit under AS 04.09.710; 24 (29) another license or permit issued by the board authorizing 25 consumption of alcoholic beverages. 26 * Sec. 2. AS 04.21.065(b) is amended to read: 27 (b) The warning signs required by (a) of this section must be at least 11 inches 28 by 14 inches, and the lettering must be at least one-half inch high and in contrasting 29 colors. The first sign must read, "WARNING: Alcohol use [DRINKING 30 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES SUCH AS BEER, WINE, WINE COOLERS, AND 31 DISTILLED SPIRITS OR SMOKING CIGARETTES] during pregnancy can cause 01 birth defects. Alcohol use can cause cancer, including breast and colon cancers." 02 The second sign must read, "WARNING: An unaccompanied person under 21 03 years of age who enters these premises in violation of law may, under 04 AS 04.16.049(e), be civilly liable for damages of $1,500. A person who provides 05 alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age, if convicted under 06 AS 04.16.051, could be imprisoned for up to five years and fined up to $50,000." 07 [THE THIRD SIGN MUST READ, "WARNING: AN UNACCOMPANIED 08 PERSON UNDER 21 YEARS OF AGE WHO ENTERS THESE PREMISES IN 09 VIOLATION OF LAW MAY, UNDER AS 04.16.049(e), BE CIVILLY LIABLE 10 FOR DAMAGES OF $1,500."] The license or permit holder shall display the first 11 sign [AND SECOND SIGNS] in a manner that would make it [THEM] conspicuous 12 to a person who will be purchasing or consuming alcoholic beverages or smoking 13 cigarettes on the licensed or designated premises and shall conspicuously display the 14 second [THIRD] sign at each door through which customers enter the licensed 15 premises. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.